Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4111
Reports; contents.

The Public Guardian
shall report to the State Court Administrator as directed by the State Court
Administrator. The Public Guardian shall report to the Chief Justice and the
Legislature on the implementation of the Public Guardianship Act on or before
January 1 of each year. The report to the Legislature shall be made electronically.
The report shall include the number and types of guardianships and conservatorships
for which the Public Guardian has been appointed, including full guardianships,
limited guardianships, and temporary guardianships, the disposition of those
appointments, the amount of guardianship and conservatorship fees charged
and collected under the act, and the status of the waiting list for public
guardianship and public conservatorship services.

Laws 2014, LB920, § 11.